Klingon/kli.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [Pl] [Dim] [Aug] [Poss]
                  [1sg] [1pl] [2sg] [2pl] [3sg] [3pl]
                  [Loc] [Abl] [Caus] [Ben]
                  @P.NUM.SENTIENT@ 
                  @R.NUM.SENTIENT@
                  @D.NUM.SENTIENT@ 
                  @P.NUM.BODYPART@
                  @R.NUM.BODYPART@
                  @P.NUM.PLURAL@
                  @D.NUM.PLURAL@
                  @P.NUM.SINGULAR@
                  @D.NUM@
                   

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
!QIH       N1;  ! destruction
!jolpaʼ    N1;  ! transport room
!paʼ       N1;  ! room
[human]:teraʼngan Sentient;  ! Earther, Terran
!tlhIngan  Sentient;  ! Klingon
[nostril]:tlhon  BodyPart;  ! nostril
[target]:rayʼ InherentlyPlural; ! target
[target]:DoS  InherentlySingular;  ! target


LEXICON Sentient
@P.NUM.SENTIENT@ N1 ;

LEXICON BodyPart
@P.NUM.BODYPART@ N1 ;

LEXICON InherentlyPlural
@P.NUM.PLURAL@[Pl]:@P.NUM.PLURAL@ N1 ;

LEXICON InherentlySingular
@P.NUM.SINGULAR@:@P.NUM.SINGULAR@ N1 ;

! Type 1 noun suffixes: Augmentative/diminutive
LEXICON N1   
[Aug]:ʼaʼ  N2 ; ! augmentative
[Dim]:Hom  N2 ; ! diminutive
0:0        N2 ;
0:0        #  ;

! Type 2 noun suffixes: Number
LEXICON N2
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[Pl]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@puʼ   N3 ; ! plural for beings capable of using language
@R.NUM.BODYPART@[Pl]:@R.NUM.BODYPART@Duʼ   N3 ; ! plural for body parts
@D.NUM@[Pl]:@D.NUM@mey                     N3 ; ! plural, general usage
@D.NUM.PLURAL@[Pl][scattered.about]:@D.NUM.PLURAL@mey   N3 ; ! plural, general use, scattered about
0:0        N3 ;
0:0        #  ;

! Type 3 noun suffixes: Qualification
LEXICON N3
[so.called]:qoq   N4 ;
[apparent]:Hey    N4 ;
[undoubtedly]:naʼ N4 ;
0:0               N4 ;
0:0               #  ;

! Type 4 noun suffixes: Possession/specification
LEXICON N4
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[1sg][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@wIʼ   N5 ; ! my (sentient)
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[1sg][Poss][derogatory]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@wIj   N5 ; ! my (sentient)
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[1sg][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@wIj   N5 ; ! my (non-sentient)
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[1pl][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@maʼ   N5 ; ! our (sentient)
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[1pl][Poss][derogatory]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@maj   N5 ; ! our (sentient)
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[1pl][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@maj   N5 ; ! our (non-sentient)
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[2sg][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@lIʼ   N5 ; ! your (sentient)
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[2sg][Poss][derogatory]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@lIj   N5 ; ! your (sentient)
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[2sg][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@lIj   N5 ; ! your (non-sentient)
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[2pl][Poss]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@raʼ   N5 ; ! your (pl) (sentient)
@R.NUM.SENTIENT@[2pl][Poss][derogatory]:@R.NUM.SENTIENT@raj   N5 ; ! your (pl) (sentient)
@D.NUM.SENTIENT@[2pl][Poss]:@D.NUM.SENTIENT@raj   N5 ; ! your (pl) (non-sentient)
[3sg][Poss]:Daj   N5 ; ! his, her, its
[3pl][Poss]:chaj  N5 ; ! their
[this]:vam        N5 ;
[that]:vetlh      N5 ;
0:0               N5 ;
0:0               #  ;

! Type 5 noun suffixes: Syntactic markers
LEXICON N5
[Loc]:Daq         # ; ! Locative
[Abl]:voʼ         # ; ! from (ablative)
[Cau]:moʼ         # ; ! due to, because of (causal)
[Ben]:vaD         # ; ! for, intended for (benefactive)
[emphasized]:ʼeʼ  # ; ! "emphasizes that the noun to which it is attached is the topic of the sentence"
